Mississippi statutes. Title 59. Ports, Harbors, Landings and Watercraft
Article 3. Supplementary Provisions.

§ 59-7-101.
Nature and application of article.

This article is supplementary and in addition to Article 1 of this chapter, and shall not apply to any county or counties of the state already receiving two mills of the state ad valorem taxes for port or harbor purposes.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7576-16; Laws, 1954, Ex. Sess. ch. 28, § 16.

§ 59-7-103.
Port fund; procedure for bringing county within provisions of article.

In order to provide for the improvement, promotion, development, construction, maintenance and operation of harbors or ports in counties having or hereafter providing harbors or ports where wharf or terminal or other facilities exist for the handling of inbound or outbound waterborne cargo moving in interstate or foreign commerce and where there is maintained a channel, harbor or port with a depth of not less than nine (9) feet, there shall be and there is hereby created in each such county electing to exercise the provisions of this article a special fund to be known as the “port fund,” into which payments shall be made as follows:

The tax collector of each such county electing to come under this article shall deduct from all state ad valorem taxes collected by him a sum equal to the avails of a levy of two (2) mills on the dollar of the assessed valuation of taxable property within such county upon which state ad valorem taxes are levied and collected. The amount so deducted shall be set aside by the tax collector and shall by him be paid into the said port fund of such county. Such payments shall be continued as long as there remains unpaid and outstanding any bonded indebtedness created by the board of supervisors of such county as hereinafter provided.

The board of supervisors of each such county electing to exercise the provisions of this article shall pay or cause to be paid into the aforesaid port fund a sum equal to one-fourth (1/4) of the sum paid into said fund under subsection (a) above and such payments shall be continued as long as there remains unpaid and outstanding any bonded indebtedness created by such board of supervisors as hereinafter provided. Any such board of supervisors shall provide the sum herein required either by appropriation from any available funds of the county or by the levy, in addition to all other county taxes, of a tax of not more than two (2) mills on the dollar of the assessed valuation of taxable property within such county upon which taxes for the general county fund are levied and collected. In case of a special tax levy as herein authorized, the tax collector of each such county shall set aside the avails of such levy and shall pay the same directly into the port fund of such county.

The port commission hereinafter provided for shall pay into the port fund all of the revenues of whatsoever nature which may be derived from or through the use of the harbor, port, wharf or terminal facilities under its jurisdiction as hereinafter provided.

In order to come within the provisions of this article, the board of supervisors of any such county shall, by appropriate resolution spread upon its minutes, declare its intention so to do and shall annually provide for the necessary matching county funds. A certified copy of such resolution shall be filed with the tax collector of such county and shall constitute his authority to set aside the taxes hereinabove referred to and to pay the same into the aforesaid port fund.

Provided further, that any county in the State of Mississippi through which a river or other stream flows, and which stream is classed as navigable and maintained as such by any agency of the federal government, and wherein harbors, wharves, ports, terminals or other facilities exist or are proposed or established hereafter for the handling of inbound or outbound waterborne cargo moving in interstate or foreign commerce, and where there is maintained a channel, harbor or port of such depth necessary for said purposes, then in such event such county may come under the provisions of this article if and when its application to come under the provisions of this article is approved by the Mississippi Board of Economic Development, which board shall adjudicate and determine the feasibility of said project so applied for and whether or not it is economically feasible. Certified copies of the order of said board shall be filed with the auditor of public accounts and the tax collector of such county affected.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7576-01; Laws, 1954, Ex. Sess. ch. 28, § 1; Laws, 1958, ch. 583; Laws, 1962, ch. 390; Laws, 1968, ch. 361, § 12; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 253, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

§ 59-7-105.
Issuance of bonds by board of supervisors.

To provide additional or supplemental funds for the aforesaid purposes, and in connection therewith to acquire and develop water, air and rail terminals, rail lines, and such other structures, facilities, lands, property or rights therein needful for the convenient use of the same in the aid of commerce, and land for industrial operations, including the establishment and development of industrial parks, as provided in Section 59-9-17 and related sections, the board of supervisors of any such county may issue bonds of such county in an amount not exceeding the principal sum of eleven million dollars ($11,000,000.00). No county shall issue bonds under the provisions of this article which will result in outstanding bonded indebtedness incurred under the provisions of this article in excess of eight million dollars ($8,000,000.00) unless and until the question of the issuance of such bonds shall have been submitted to and approved by a majority of the qualified electors of the county voting in an election called and held for the purpose of considering whether or not such bonds should be issued. The first six million dollars ($6,000,000.00) in aggregate original principal amount of bonds issued under authority of this article shall not be included in computing any present or future debt limit of such county under any present or future law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7576-02; Laws, 1954, Ex. Sess. ch. 28, § 2; Laws, 1960, ch. 205; Laws, 1962, ch. 391; Laws, 1964, ch. 426; Laws, 1974, ch. 445; Laws, 1978, ch. 411, § 1; Laws, 1980, ch. 324, § 1; Laws, 1982, ch. 359; Laws, 1984, ch. 423, eff from and after passage (approved April 23, 1984).

§ 59-7-107.
Details of bonds; supplemental powers and authorizations as to bond issues.

All bonds authorized by Section 59-7-105 shall be negotiable instruments within the meaning of the Mississippi Uniform Commercial Code, shall be lithographed or engraved, and printed in two (2) or more colors, to prevent counterfeiting, shall be registered as issued, shall be numbered in a regular series from one (1) upward, and each bond shall specify on its face the purpose for which it was issued and the total amount authorized to be issued, shall be payable to bearer, and the interest to accrue thereon shall be evidenced by proper coupons to be attached thereto. Such bonds shall be executed by the manual of facsimile signature of the president of the board of supervisors, or the vice president in the absence or disability of the president, and countersigned by the manual of facsimile signature of the clerk thereof, with the official seal of the county affixed thereto. At least one (1) signature on each bond shall be a manual signature, as specified in the issuing resolution. The coupons may bear only the facsimile signatures of such president, or vice president and clerk. All such bonds shall be sold at public sale as provided by law, and no such bonds shall be issued and sold for less than par and accrued interest, and not more than one (1) series of interest coupons shall be attached to any such bonds. All interest accruing on such bonds shall be payable semiannually, except that the first interest coupon attached to any such bond may represent interest for any period not exceeding one (1) year.

Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this section, bonds referred to hereinabove may be issued pursuant to the supplemental powers and authorizations conferred by the provisions of the Registered Bond Act, being Sections 31-21-1 through 31-21-7.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7576-03; Laws, 1954, Ex. Sess. ch. 28, § 3; Laws, 1978, ch. 411, § 2; Laws, 1983, ch. 494, § 29; eff from and after passage (approved April 11, 1983).

§ 59-7-109.
Maturities of bonds; interest.

All bonds authorized by Section 59-7-105 shall mature annually, with all maturities not longer than twenty (20) years, with not less than one-fiftieth (1/50) of the total issue to mature each year during the first five (5) years of the life of such bonds, not less than one-twenty-fifth (1/25) of the total issue to mature each year during the succeeding ten-year period of the life of such bonds, and the remainder to be divided into approximately equal annual payments, one (1) payment to mature each year for the remaining life of such bonds. Such bonds shall not bear a greater overall maximum interest rate to maturity than that allowed in Section 75-17-101, Mississippi Code of 1972. The denomination, form and place or places of payment of such bonds shall be fixed in the resolution or order of the board of supervisors issuing such bonds.

No interest payment shall be evidenced by more than one (1) coupon, and neither cancelled nor supplemental coupons shall be permitted. The lowest interest rate specified for any bonds issued shall not be less than sixty percent (60%) of the highest interest rate specified for the same bond issue. The interest rate of any one (1) interest coupon shall not exceed the maximum interest rate allowed on such bonds.

Each interest rate specified in any bid must be in multiples of one-eighth of one percent (1/8 of 1%) or in multiples of one-tenth of one percent (1/10 of 1%), and a zero rate of interest cannot be named.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7576-04; Laws, 1954, Ex. Sess. ch. 28, § 4; Laws, 1970, ch. 408, § 1; Laws, 1976, ch. 443; Laws, 1978, ch. 411, § 3; Laws, 1980, ch. 324, § 2; Laws, 1981, ch. 462, § 16; Laws, 1982, ch. 434, § 29; Laws, 1983, ch. 541, § 37, eff from and after passage (approved April 25, 1983).

§ 59-7-111.
Levy of special tax for payment of principal and interest on bonds; port bonds interest and sinking fund.

The board of supervisors of any county which shall have issued bonds under the provisions of this article shall, unless there be sufficient funds otherwise available therefor in the port bonds interest and sinking fund, annually levy a special tax upon all of the taxable property within such county at a rate which shall be sufficient to provide for the payment of the principal of and the interest on such bonds according to the terms thereof. All taxes thus collected shall be credited to a special fund in the county treasury of such county to be known and designated as the “port bonds interest and sinking fund,” and all sums credited to said fund shall be used to pay such bonds as they mature and the interest thereon as it accrues, and for no other purpose. It shall be the mandatory duty of such board of supervisors to transfer funds from said port fund to the port bonds interest and sinking fund in amounts sufficient to pay maturing principal and accruing interest on bonds issued hereunder, if balances standing to the credit of said port fund are sufficient for that purpose. To the extent that funds are thus made available for the payment of such bonds and the interest thereon, the special tax levy hereinabove provided for may be correspondingly reduced. The said bonds nevertheless shall be general obligations of the county issuing the same, and the full faith, credit and resources of such county shall be pledged to the payment thereof and the interest thereon.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7576-05; Laws, 1954, Ex. Sess. ch. 28, § 5.

§ 59-7-113.
Resolution of intention to issue bonds; bond issue election generally.

Before issuing any bonds for any of the purposes herein enumerated, the board of supervisors shall adopt a resolution declaring its intention so to do, stating the amount of bonds proposed to be issued and the purpose for which the bonds are to be issued, and the date upon which the board proposes to direct the issuance of such bonds. Such resolution shall be published once a week for at least three consecutive weeks in at least one newspaper published in such county. The first publication of such resolution shall be made not less than twenty-one days prior to the date fixed in such resolution for the issuance of the bonds, and the last publication shall be made not more than seven days prior to such date. If no newspaper be published in such county, then such notice shall be given by publishing the resolution for the required time in some newspaper having a general circulation in such county and, in addition, by posting a copy of such resolution for at least twenty-one days next preceding the date fixed therein at three public places in such county. If twenty per cent (20%) of the qualified electors of the county shall file a written protest against the issuance of such bonds on or before the date specified in such resolution, then an election on the question of the issuance of such bonds shall be called and held as is herein provided. If no such protest be filed, then such bonds may be issued without an election on the question of the issuance thereof, at any time within a period of two years after the date specified in the above-mentioned resolution. However, the board of supervisors, in its discretion, may nevertheless call an election on such question, in which event it shall not be necessary to publish the resolution declaring its intention to issue such bonds as herein provided.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7576-06; Laws, 1954, Ex. Sess. ch. 28, § 6.

§ 59-7-115.
Notice of election on bond issue.

Where an election is to be called, as provided in Section 59-7-113, notice of such election shall be signed by the clerk of the board of supervisors and shall be published once a week for at least three consecutive weeks, in at least one newspaper published in such county. The first publication of such notice shall be made not less than twenty-one days prior to the date fixed for such election and the last publication shall be made not more than seven days prior to such date. If no newspaper is published in such county, then such notice shall be given by publishing the same for the required time in some newspaper having a general circulation in such county, and, in addition, by posting a copy of such notice for at least twenty-one days next preceding such election at three public places in such county.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7576-07; Laws, 1954, Ex. Sess. ch. 28, § 7.

§ 59-7-117.
Conduct of election on issue of bonds; qualifications of electors; form and marking of ballots.

The election provided for in Sections 59-7-113 and 59-7-115 shall be held, as far as is practicable, in the same manner as other elections are held in counties. At such election, all qualified electors of such county may vote, and the ballots used at such election shall have printed thereon a brief statement of the amount and purpose of the proposed bond issue and the words “FOR THE BOND ISSUE” and “AGAINST THE BOND ISSUE,” and the voter shall vote by placing a cross (x) or check mark (Π) opposite his choice on the proposition.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7576-08; Laws, 1954, Ex. Sess. ch. 28, § 8.

§ 59-7-119.
Duties of board of supervisors as to elections.

When the results of the election on the question of the issuance of bonds under the provisions of this article shall have been canvassed by the election commissioners of such county and certified by them to the board of supervisors of such county, it shall be the duty of such board of supervisors to determine and adjudicate whether or not three-fifths (3/5ths) of the qualified electors who voted in such election voted in favor of the issuance of such bonds and, unless three-fifths (3/5ths) of the qualified electors who voted in such election shall have voted in favor of the issuance of such bonds, then such bonds shall not be issued. Should three-fifths (3/5ths) of the qualified electors who vote in such election vote in favor of the issuance of such bonds, then the board of supervisors of the county may issue such bonds, either in whole or in part, within two years from the date of such election, or within two years after the final favorable termination of any litigation affecting the issuance of such bonds, as such board shall deem best.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7576-09; Laws, 1954, Ex. Sess. ch. 28, § 9.

§ 59-7-121.
Disposition of proceeds of bond issues; penalties for diversion.

The proceeds of any bonds issued by any county pursuant to the provisions of this article shall be placed in the county treasury or depository, if there be one, in a special fund and shall be expended by the board of supervisors of such county for the purpose or purposes for which the bonds were authorized to be issued, and for no other. If the board of supervisors of any such county or any member thereof or any other officer shall willfully divert or aid or assist in diverting any such fund, or any part thereof, to any purpose other than that for which such bonds were authorized to be issued, such person shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, shall be punished by imprisonment in the state penitentiary for a term not exceeding five years and, in addition, shall be liable personally on his official bond for the amount so diverted. Any member of such board of supervisors may escape the penalty herein provided for by having his vote recorded in the negative on any illegal diversion of the proceeds of such bonds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7576-10; Laws, 1954, Ex. Sess. ch. 28, § 10.

§ 59-7-123.
Transfer of proceeds of bond issue to port bonds interest and sinking fund.

Whenever a balance shall remain in the proceeds of any bond issue after the purpose for which such bonds were issued shall have been accomplished, such balance shall forthwith be transferred to the port bonds interest and sinking fund hereinabove provided for.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7576-11; Laws, 1954, Ex. Sess. ch. 28, § 11.

§ 59-7-125.
Port commission; composition, dissolution, oath, bond, terms and quorum.

All improvements constructed by the board of supervisors under the provisions of this article shall be operated and maintained by a port commission composed of five (5) residents of such county who shall be qualified electors therein. Such commission shall have jurisdiction over the port, terminals, harbors and passes leading thereto, and all vessels, boats and wharves, common carriers, and public utilities therein, using the same, within their respective counties. Such port commission shall be appointed as follows: one (1) member shall be appointed by the Governor, two (2) shall be appointed by the board of supervisors of the county, and two (2) shall be appointed by the governing body of the municipality which is the county seat of such county in such cases where the county seat of such county is situate on or adjacent to such port facilities, otherwise, four (4) members shall be appointed by the board of supervisors. A county and a municipality may by joint resolution dissolve a port commission created under this section which is governed by a commission with two (2) commissioners appointed by each. The joint resolution must provide that the municipality relinquishes its duties and obligations related to the port, and that the county assumes all duties and obligations related to the port. Any commission so dissolved shall be reconstituted to consist of five (5) members, one (1) member appointed from each supervisor district. The board of supervisors shall provide for staggered terms in its order providing for the appointment of the reconstituted port commission. Before entering upon the duties of the office, each of such commissioners shall take and subscribe to the oath of office required by Section 268 of the Constitution of the State of Mississippi, and shall give bond, to be approved by the board of supervisors, in the sum of Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), conditioned upon the faithful performance of their duties. Such bond shall be made payable to the county and in case of breach thereof, suit may be brought on the relation of the county for the benefit of such port commission. Such commissioners shall hold office for a term of four (4) years from the date of their appointment and qualification and until their successor or successors shall be appointed and qualified as set out herein. Three (3) members of the port commission shall be necessary to constitute a quorum for the conducting of business.

The members of the board of supervisors shall be ex officio members of the port commission, but no bond shall be required of them in such capacity; provided, however, the members of the board of supervisors shall be nonvoting members of the port commission and shall not be included or counted for the determination of a quorum for conducting of business by the port commission unless and until the board of supervisors of a particular county, by order entered on its minutes, expressly provides that the members of the board of supervisors shall be voting members of the port commission and the number of members required for a quorum to conduct business of the port commission, but in no event shall the number required for a quorum to conduct business of the port commission be less than three (3).

All actions heretofore taken by the various port commissions at which at least three (3) members were present and which would otherwise have been legal actions except for the absence of a legal quorum being present and voting are hereby ratified, confirmed and approved.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7576-12; Laws, 1954, Ex. Sess. ch. 28, § 12; Laws, 1976, ch. 448; Laws, 1998, ch. 365, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 16, 1998).

§ 59-7-127.
Meetings; officers.

When such port commissioners provided for in Section 59-7-125 shall have been appointed and shall have been qualified as set out herein, they shall meet at the regular meeting place of the board of supervisors of such county, after giving at least five days’ notice of the time and place of such meeting by publication in a newspaper published at the county seat of such county. At such meeting they shall elect a president and a secretary who shall be members of the commission, and adopt such rules as may govern the time and place for holding meetings, regular and special, not inconsistent with the provisions of this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7576-13; Laws, 1954, Ex. Sess. ch. 28, § 13.

§ 59-7-129.
Powers and duties of commission generally.

The duties and powers of such port commission provided for in Section 59-7-125 shall be the same as those which are set forth and prescribed in Sections 59-1-9 and 59-1-27, except that the salary of the port director shall be subject to the approval of the board of supervisors.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7576-14; Laws, 1954, Ex. Sess. ch. 28, § 14.

§ 59-7-131.
Recommendations by commission as to expenditure of funds.

It shall be the duty of such port commission, from time to time, to make recommendations to the board of supervisors of such county concerning expenditures to be made for the improvement, promotion, development, construction, maintenance and operation of the harbor and port facilities of such county, and shall annually submit to such board of supervisors a proposed budget for the operation and maintenance of such harbor and port facilities, which recommendations and budget shall be subject to approval of the board of supervisors. Except as provided in Section 59-7-111, the port fund shall be subject to expenditure by the port commission.

The port commission may recommend to the Legislative Budget Office, the State Fiscal Management Board, and the county board of supervisors that certain excess funds in the port fund be transferred to any industrial development authority within the county. Upon approval by the State Fiscal Management Board and the county board of supervisors, the port commission may transfer such excess funds, or any portion thereof which may be designated by the State Fiscal Management Board and county board of supervisors, as provided herein.

The port commission in any county bordering the Mississippi River and having a population of more than fifty-one thousand (51,000) but less than fifty-two thousand (52,000) according to the 1980 federal census may recommend to the board of supervisors the expenditure of excess funds in the port fund for the acquisition of lands in the county to be used for industrial development purposes. Upon the acquisition of such lands, excess funds in the port fund may also be expended to provide necessary utilities and other improvements the board of supervisors deems necessary and requisite for industrial development. Any lands acquired hereunder shall be titled in the name of the county.

For the purposes of this section, the term “excess funds” means monies determined to be in excess of those necessary to fund the budget for the fiscal year.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7576-15; Laws, 1954, Ex. Sess. ch. 28, § 15; Laws, 1983, ch. 532; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 254; Laws, 1986, ch. 323, eff from and after passage (approved March 13, 1986).